Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 5. Stopping, Standing and Parking

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 973 to 1019.

When is motor vehicle “disabled” or the like within exceptions of statute regulating parking or stopping, 15 ALR2d 909.

Construction and effect in civil actions of statute, ordinance or regulation requiring vehicles to be stopped or parked parallel with and within certain distances of curb, 17 ALR2d 582.

Construction and operation of regulations as to sudden stop or slowing of motor vehicle, 29 ALR2d 5.

Right to park vehicles on private way, 37 ALR2d 944.

Inference or presumption that owner of motor vehicle was its driver at time of parking offense, 49 ALR2d 456.

Negligence in failing to set out flares or lights or station person to warn of stationary motor vehicle on or adjacent to highway, 67 ALR2d 12.

Liability of owner or driver of double-parked motor vehicle for ensuing injury, death or damage, 82 ALR2d 726.

Motorist's liability for injury to one in or about a street or highway for the purpose of directing or warning traffic, 98 ALR2d 1169.

Liability of owner or operator of automobile for injury to one assisting in extricating or starting his stalled or ditched car, 3 ALR3d 780.

Parking illegally at or near street corner or intersection as affecting liability for motor vehicle accident, 4 ALR3d 324.

Liability of motorist colliding with person assisting or near stalled or disabled vehicle on or near highway, 27 ALR3d 12.

Applicability of last clear chance doctrine to collision between moving and stalled, parked or standing motor vehicle, 34 ALR3d 570.

Brakes: failure to set brakes, or maintain adequate brakes, as causing accidental runaway of parked motor vehicle, 42 ALR3d 1252.

Contributory negligence as defense to action for injury or damage caused by accidental starting up of parked motor vehicle, 43 ALR3d 930.

Presumption of negligence and application of res ipsa loquitur doctrine in action for injury or damage caused by accidental starting up of a parked motor vehicle, 55 ALR3d 1260.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action as affected by absence or insufficiency of lights on parked or standing motor vehicle, 61 ALR3d 13.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 51 to 62.

§ 31-5-501.
Authority to place signs prohibiting, regulating or restricting parking; handicapped parking; obedience to signs required; free parking areas.

The highway department with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, and boards of county commissioners of the counties or any duly appointed board of trustees of any fairgrounds, airports, parks, pleasure grounds or recreational systems or other duly constituted state or local public boards, with respect to public lands under their supervision and control, may place signs prohibiting, regulating the time of or restricting the parking of vehicles where in the opinion of the commission or board having jurisdiction thereof, parking is dangerous to those using highways, public ways or areas where the parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic thereon, or where it is necessary to regulate parking for the welfare of the general public or for the proper use of public lands.

Signs reserving parking spaces for the handicapped in public places under the jurisdiction of the government agencies described in subsection (a) of this section or placed on private property by the real property owner pursuant to W.S.

31-5-111

shall be constructed of durable material, contain the international symbol of accessibility, be no less than twelve inches (12”) by eighteen inches (18”) in size and be placed above ground level so as to be visible at all times and not be obscured by a vehicle parked in that space. Parking spaces for the handicapped shall be located on the shortest possible accessible circulation route to an accessible entrance of the building. In public parking lots of ten (10) or more parking spaces, at least two percent (2%) of the total number of available parking spaces but not less than one (1) space shall be reserved for the handicapped. Handicapped parking spaces shall allow easy entrance and exit for wheelchairs, to include signage and any cross-hatched handicapped vehicle access markings that may be adjacent to the handicapped parking space, and be located on a level surface.

The signs specified under this section and W.S. 31-5-111(b) shall be official signs and it is unlawful for any person to willfully park a vehicle in violation of the restrictions, regulations or prohibitions stated on the signs. This subsection shall not prohibit use of handicapped parking spaces provided under subsection (b) of this section by a person issued a distinctive handicapped license plate or transferable identification card by another state and displaying the plate or card on a vehicle used by this person.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 145, § 1.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 60-528; W.S. 1957, § 31-144; Laws 1977, ch. 37, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 153, § 1; 1987, ch. 133, § 1; 1993, ch. 6, § 1; 1998, ch. 103, § 1; 2012, ch. 56, § 1; 2020 ch. 145, § 1, effective March 24, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to state highway department generally, see chapter 2 of title 24.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “to include signage and any cross-hatched handicapped vehicle access markings that may be adjacent to the handicapped parking space” in (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, repealed (d), which read “For public convenience, commissioners or boards having jurisdiction to regulate parking of vehicles shall provide free parking areas adequate to accommodate at least twenty percent (20%) of the number of vehicle parking spaces for which a fee is charged.”

Laws 2020, ch. 145, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

§ 31-5-502.
Penalty for violation of W.S. 31-5-501.

Every person who is convicted of a violation of W.S.

31-5-501

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof by any court of competent jurisdiction, is subject to a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 24, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 60-528; W.S. 1957, § 31-145; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-503.
Erection and maintenance of traffic-control devices to designate through highways.

The superintendent with reference to state highways and local authorities with reference to other highways under their jurisdiction may erect and maintain stop signs, yield signs or other traffic-control devices to designate through highways, or to designate intersections or other roadway junctions at which vehicular traffic on one (1) or more of the roadways should yield or stop and yield before entering the intersection or junction.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 85; C.S. 1945, § 60-685; W.S. 1957, § 31-146; Laws 1963, ch. 51, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Local authorities liable for failing to erect and maintainstop signs. —

The erection and maintenance of a stop sign is mandatory whenever a through street has been established and designated. If a county or city fails to comply with this mandate, it is liable in damages to users of the highways injured by the default. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

Which includes maintaining visibility. —

A city having elected to establish a through street and having erected the required stop sign is obligated to maintain its visibility and to exercise special care that shrubbery, i.e., trees, is not allowed to obscure the sign and prevent it from conveying its message effectively. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

And governmental immunity waived. —

An imperative duty is placed upon a city to erect and adequately maintain a sufficient stop sign at corner of a through street, and since this imperative municipal duty has been legislatively ordained, the city's usual governmental immunity is impliedly waived. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

Driver on through street entitled to assume way clear. —

Where there is a through street, the vehicle driver thereon has a right to assume the way is clear for his passage through intersections, whereas the driver of a vehicle on the nonthrough intersecting street is subjected to a new and added peril when entering the intersection unless given warning of the superior right of the driver upon the through street in the use of the intersection. Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

But where there is no through street, both drivers must exercise same care.

Fanning v. Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965) (commented on in I Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966)).

Quoted

in

Husted v. French Creek Ranch, Inc., 79 Wyo. 307, 333 P.2d 948,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1959).

Cited

in

Colwell v. Anderson, 438 P.2d 448,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 31-5-504.
Specific places where prohibited.

Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or traffic-control device, no person shall:

Stop, stand or park a vehicle:

On the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street;

On a sidewalk;

Within an intersection;

On a crosswalk;

Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within thirty (30) feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless a different length is indicated by signs or markings;

Alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing or parking would obstruct traffic;

Upon any bridge or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway tunnel;

On any railroad tracks;

On any controlled-access highway;

In the area between roadways of a divided highway, including crossovers;

At any place where official traffic-control devices prohibit stopping.

Stand or park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except momentarily to pick up or discharge a passenger or passengers:

In front of a public or private driveway;

Within fifteen (15) feet of a fire hydrant;

Within twenty (20) feet of a crosswalk at an intersection;

Within twenty (20) feet upon the approach to any flashing signal, stop sign, yield sign or traffic-control signal located at the side of a roadway;

Within twenty (20) feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side of a street opposite the entrance to any fire station within seventy-five (75) feet of the entrance when properly signposted;

At any place where official traffic-control devices prohibit standing.

Park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading property or passengers:

Within fifty (50) feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing;

At any place where official traffic-control devices prohibit parking.

No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under his control into any prohibited area or away from a curb such a distance as is unlawful.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 91; C.S. 1945, § 60-691; W.S. 1957, § 31-147; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(I) or (a)(i)(L) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-5-505.
Roadways outside of business or residence districts.

Outside a business or residence district no person shall stop, park or leave standing any vehicle, whether attended or unattended, upon the roadway when it is practicable to stop, park or so leave the vehicle off the roadway, but in every event an unobstructed width of the highway opposite a standing vehicle shall be left for the free passage of other vehicles and a clear view of the stopped vehicles shall be available for a distance of two hundred (200) feet in each direction upon the highway.

This section and W.S.

31-5-504

do not apply to the driver of any vehicle which is disabled in such manner and to such extent that it is impossible to avoid stopping and temporarily leaving the vehicle in that position.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 89; C.S. 1945, § 60-689; W.S. 1957, § 31-148; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Purpose of section. —

It is obvious from any fair reading and interpretation of this section that its purpose is to prevent traffic hazards created by persons who thoughtlessly or unnecessarily leave a vehicle where other travelers are compelled to travel around it. Reindal v. Casassa, 444 P.2d 321,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1968).

Driver need not anticipate that anyone will stop in his lane.—

One driving a car over the crest of a hill on an open road is not required to anticipate that anyone will be virtually stopped in his lane of travel. Templar v. Tongate, 71 Wyo. 148, 255 P.2d 223,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1953).

Failure to take vehicle off highway excused by lack of safeexit. —

The failure to take a vehicle off the highway, after a defect in the lights develop, will be excused if the driver in the exercise of due care is unable to find a reasonably safe exit from the highway. Merback v. Blanchard, 56 Wyo. 152, 105 P.2d 272,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1940), reh'g denied, 56 Wyo. 286, 109 P.2d 49,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1941).

Driver stopped by temporary traffic blockage not required toleave traffic lane. —

A lane of traffic may be temporarily blocked in the course of highway maintenance work, or by an accident, and the effect on travelers becomes the same as a red light. Obviously, subsection (a) was not intended to require a driver of a motor vehicle to leave his lane of traffic and give way to travelers from behind when forward progress is prevented by traffic being blocked. Reindal v. Casassa, 444 P.2d 321,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1968).

Trial court question. —

Where a collision might have occurred had the defendant's car been in motion instead of temporarily stopped on the highway, during fog, the question of the plaintiff's negligence, under the evidence presented, is one for the trial court. Gamet v. Beazley, 62 Wyo. 1, 159 P.2d 916,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1945).

Cited

in

Arbenz v. Debout, 444 P.2d 317,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 31-5-506.
Emerging from alley, building, private road or driveway.

The driver of a vehicle emerging from an alley, building, private road or driveway within a business or residence district shall stop the vehicle immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or onto the sidewalk area extending across the alley, building entrance, road or driveway, or if there is no sidewalk area, shall stop at a point nearest the street to be entered where the driver has a view of approaching traffic thereon.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 86; C.S. 1945, § 60-686; W.S. 1957, § 31-149; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-507.
Meeting or passing stopped school bus; markings and visual signals.

The driver of a vehicle upon meeting or overtaking from either direction any stopped school bus shall stop before reaching the school bus when there is in operation on the school bus the flashing red lights as specified in W.S.

31-5-929

and the driver shall not proceed until the school bus resumes motion or the flashing red lights are no longer actuated.

Every school bus shall bear upon the front and rear thereof plainly visible signs containing the words “school bus” in letters not less than eight (8) inches in height, and in addition shall be equipped with red visual signals meeting the requirements of W.S.

31-5-929

, which shall be actuated by the driver of the school bus whenever the vehicle is stopped and is receiving or discharging school children in designated school bus loading areas. When stopped to receive or discharge school children, the school bus driver shall keep the bus as far to the right of the roadway as reasonable. Except at a crosswalk, no school bus shall receive or discharge school children upon a roadway with four (4) or more lanes if the child would be required to cross a lane. The board of trustees of a school district may waive the requirement in this subsection that school bus drivers actuate visual signals if:

The board finds the safety of children is not jeopardized; and

The bus is not on a public roadway.

Before a school bus is sold by a school district all legal markings on the bus indicating it was once a school bus shall be concealed with paint unless sold to another school district in Wyoming.

The driver of a vehicle upon a highway with separate roadways need not stop upon meeting or passing a school bus which is on a different roadway or when upon a controlled-access highway and the school bus is stopped in a loading zone which is a part of or adjacent to the highway and where pedestrians are not permitted to cross the roadway.

A recording of images produced by a video system equipped on a school bus under W.S. 21-3-131(b)(x) shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it. A recorded image evidencing a violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be admissible in a judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate liability for the violation. If the identity of the driver of a vehicle that violates subsection (a) of this section is unknown, the registered owner of the vehicle recorded by a video system as provided in this subsection shall be fined one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195.00) provided that:

A fine issued to a registered owner of a vehicle under this subsection shall not be considered a moving violation for the purpose of suspending a driver’s license under W.S.

31-7-129

and shall not be considered a conviction under W.S.

31-5-1201

or as a prior conviction for any other purpose; and

It shall be a defense to enforcement of a fine issued under this subsection that the registered owner of the vehicle:

Did not provide express or implied consent to the person who was operating the vehicle at the time of the violation; or

Transferred ownership of the vehicle to a new owner prior to the observed violation.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 87; C.S. 1945, § 60-687; W.S. 1957, § 31-150; Laws 1963, ch. 53, § 1; 1967, ch. 172, § 1; 1973, ch. 66, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1986, ch. 66, § 1; 1989, ch. 20, § 1; 2001, ch. 125, § 1; 2019 ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (e).

§ 31-5-508.
Removal of illegally stopped vehicles.

Whenever any police officer finds a vehicle in violation of W.S.

31-5-505

the officer may move the vehicle, or require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the vehicle, to a position off the roadway.

Any police officer may remove or cause to be removed to a place of safety any unattended vehicle illegally left standing upon any highway, bridge, causeway, or in any tunnel, in a position or under circumstances which obstruct the normal movement of traffic.

Any police officer may remove or cause to be removed to the nearest garage or other place of safety any vehicle found upon a highway when:

Report has been made that the vehicle has been stolen or taken without the consent of its owner;

The person in charge of the vehicle is unable to provide for its custody or removal; or

When the person driving or in control of the vehicle is arrested for an alleged offense for which the officer is required by law to take the person arrested before a proper judge without unnecessary delay.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 90; C.S. 1945, § 60-690; W.S. 1957, § 31-151; Laws 1979, ch. 94, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to abandoned vehicles generally, see chapter 13 of this title.

Inventory following impoundment proper. —

Inventory search of defendant's vehicle was proper because the court found that an officer had custody of defendant's vehicle after his arrest, and that the trooper did not act in bad faith because he inventoried the vehicle in anticipation of impounding it; no one was available to take possession of the car after defendant was arrested, and the inventory was complete by the time defendant's father arrived. Hunnicutt-Carter v. State, 2013 WY 103, 308 P.3d 847,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2013).

Unreasonable seizure of vehicle. —

Since the government failed to carry its burden of showing that the impoundment of defendant's vehicle was authorized by federal or state law, the seizure of defendant's vehicle was unreasonable. United States v. Ibarra, 955 F.2d 1405, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 1449 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

United States v. Ibarra, 725 F. Supp. 1195, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13849 (D. Wyo. 1989).

§ 31-5-509.
Requirements before leaving motor vehicle unattended.

No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the ignition, removing the key from the ignition, effectively setting the brake thereon and, when standing upon any grade, turning the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 93; C.S. 1945, § 60-693; W.S. 1957, § 31-152; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Private driveway. —

Defendant did not breach a duty under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-5-509

by leaving her vehicle unattended with the keys in the ignition, following which the vehicle was stolen and was involved in an injury causing accident, because her vehicle was parked in a private driveway and the statute applied only to vehicles standing unattended upon a highway.
Lucero v. Holbrook, 2012 WY 152, 288 P.3d 1228,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2012).

Cross references. —

As to abandonment of vehicle, see §

31-13-104

.

Leaving a vehicle unattended, by itself, is not a violation

of Wyoming law. United States v. Ibarra, 955 F.2d 1405, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 1449 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Liability of a Car Owner for a Thief's Negligence,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 125.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for personal injury or property damage caused by unauthorized use of automobile which had been parked with keys removed from ignition, 70 ALR4th 276.

§ 31-5-510.
Railroad crossings generally.

Whenever any person driving a vehicle approaches a railroad grade crossing under any of the circumstances stated in this section, the driver of the vehicle shall stop within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest rail of the railroad, and shall not proceed until he can do so safely. The foregoing requirements apply when:

A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal device gives warning of the immediate approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

A crossing gate is lowered or a flagman gives or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

A railroad train or other on-track equipment approaching a highway crossing emits an audible signal in accordance with federal railroad administration requirements and the railroad train or other on-track equipment, by reason of its speed or nearness to the crossing, is an immediate hazard;

An approaching railroad train or other on-track equipment is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity to the crossing.

No person shall drive any vehicle through, around, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing while the gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 81; C.S. 1945, § 60-681; W.S. 1957, § 31-153; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2013 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 added “or other on-track equipment” following “railroad train” in (a)(i); added “or other on-track equipment” following “railroad train” in (a)(ii); rewote (a)(iii) substituting “A railroad train or other on-track equipment approaching a highway crossing emits an audible signal in accordance with federal railroad administration requirements and the railroad train or other on-track equipment, by reason of its speed or nearness to the crossing, is an immediate hazard;” for “A railroad train approaching within approximately one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet of the highway crossing emits a signal audible from such distance and the railroad train, by reason of its speed or nearness to the crossing, is an immediate hazard;”; and added “or other on-track equipment” following “railroad train” in (a)(iv).

§ 31-5-511.
Stopping requirements for certain vehicles at railroad crossings.

The driver of any motor vehicle carrying passengers for hire, or of any school bus whether empty or carrying school children, or of any vehicle carrying a cargo or part of a cargo required to be placarded under United States department of transportation regulations, before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad, shall:

Actuate the vehicle’s four-way hazard flashers prior to stopping at the grade crossing;

Stop the vehicle within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest rail of the railroad;

While stopped, listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment and not proceed until he can do so safely;

Upon proceeding, cross the tracks without manually shifting gears and only in a gear of the vehicle which does not require manually changing gears while traversing the crossing; and

After crossing the tracks, cancel the four-way hazard flashers.

Except for school buses which will stop at all railroad crossings, this section shall not apply at:

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is controlled by a police officer or flagman;

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is regulated by a traffic-control signal;

Any railroad grade crossing protected by crossing gates or an alternately flashing light signal intended to give warning of the approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

Any railroad grade crossing at which an official traffic-control device gives notice that the stopping requirement imposed by this section does not apply.

The highway department may adopt such regulations as may be necessary describing additional vehicles which must comply with the stopping requirements of this section.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 83; C.S. 1945, § 60-683; W.S. 1957, § 31-155; Laws 1963, ch. 54, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-512

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1987, ch. 187, § 1; 2013 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013 added “or other on-track equipment” following “approaching train”; added “or other on-track equipment” following “a train” in (a)(iii); and added “or other on-track equipment” following “railroad train” in (b)(iii).

§ 31-5-512.
Parking alongside curbs or on edge of roadways; angle parking; power of highway department to place devices restricting parking.

Except as otherwise provided in this section every vehicle stopped or parked upon a two-way roadway shall be stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels of the vehicle parallel to and within eighteen (18) inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.

Except as otherwise provided by local ordinance, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a one-way roadway shall be stopped or parked parallel to the curb or edge of the roadway, in the direction of authorized traffic movement, with its right-hand wheels within eighteen (18) inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder, or with its left-hand wheels within eighteen (18) inches of the left-hand curb or as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.

Local authorities may permit angle parking on any roadway, except that angle parking shall not be permitted on any federal-aid or state highway unless the highway department has determined that the roadway is of sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free movement of traffic.

The highway department with respect to highways under its jurisdiction may place official traffic-control devices prohibiting, limiting or restricting the stopping, standing or parking of vehicles on any highway where in its opinion stopping, standing or parking, is dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping, standing or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic. No person shall stop, stand or park any vehicle in violation of the restrictions indicated by the devices.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 92; C.S. 1945, § 60-692; W.S. 1957, § 31-156; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-513; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state highway department generally, see chapter 2 of title 24.